West Virginia, session 2025, SB194.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: Article 2. Crimes Against The Person §61-2-3. Penalty for murder of second degree. Murder of the second degree shall be punished by a definite term of imprisonment in the penitentiary which is not less than ten fifteen nor more than forty sixty years. A person imprisoned pursuant to the provisions of this section is not eligible for parole prior to having served a minimum of ten fifteen years of his or her sentence or the minimum period required by the provisions of §62-12-13, whichever is greater.